North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-46 Peer Assistance Entity Agreements

43-46-01.
Definitions.

“Board” means:

The board of registry in podiatry;

The state board of chiropractic examiners;

The state board of funeral service;

The North Dakota board of nursing;

The North Dakota state board of optometry;

The state board of pharmacy;

The North Dakota board of medicine;

The North Dakota board of massage therapy;

The state examining committee for physical therapists;

The state board of dental examiners;

The state board of veterinary medical examiners;

The North Dakota state board of psychologist examiners;

The board of hearing aid specialists;

The North Dakota state board of examiners for nursing home administrators;

The state board of examiners of audiology and speech pathology;

The North Dakota board of athletic trainers;

The board of occupational therapy practice;

The North Dakota board of social work examiners;

The North Dakota state board of respiratory care;

The board of dietetic practice;

The board of addiction counseling examiners; and

Any health care-related board granted licensing authority by the legislative assembly after July 1, 1989.

“Peer assistance entity” means an organization, a program, or a committee or a professional association which is designed to address the issues of alcoholism and other drug dependency and impairment affecting practitioners of the health care professions.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 536, § 1; 2001, ch. 389, § 7; 2003, ch. 372, § 13; 2015, ch. 297, § 36, effective August 1, 2015.

43-46-02.
Agreements with peer assistance entities.

The board may enter into agreements with peer assistance entities to undertake those functions and responsibilities specified in the agreements which assist the board in performing its duties, implementing disciplinary actions or sanctions, and in otherwise addressing potential or confirmed problems of alcohol or drug abuse and impairment regarding board licentiates.

To fund the activities of a peer assistance entity as specified and undertaken under an agreement, the board may annually allocate to the entity a fixed portion of each licentiate registration or licensure fee, or any portion of additional funds available to the board from other sources.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 536, § 1.